Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.250

Action on bond—Failure to comply with chapter.

The director or any vendor or consignor creditor may also bring action upon said bond against both principal and surety in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover the damages caused by any failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter and the rules and/or regulations adopted hereunder.

[ 1959 c 107 s 25.]